Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7653.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-29-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-29 entitled "Domestic
Violence Prevention Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-29-8. Domestic violence reports.
(a) A law enforcement officer who responds to or investigates a domestic violence incident
shall complete a domestic violence report/sexual assault reporting form, whether or not an arrest
occurs.
(b) For the purpose of establishing accurate data on the extent and severity of domestic
violence in the state and on the degree of compliance with the requirements of § 12-29-3, the
domestic violence training and monitoring unit of the court system within the administrative office
of state courts shall prescribe a form and process for making submitting domestic violence reports
information to the unit. The form shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:
(1) Name of the parties;
(2) Relationship of the parties;
(3) Sex of the parties;
(4) Date of birth of the parties;
(5) Time and date of the incident;
(6) Whether children were involved or whether the alleged act of domestic violence was
committed in the presence of children;
(7) Type and extent of the alleged abuse;

(8) Number and types of weapons involved;
(9) Existence of any prior court order; and
(10) Existence of any language barriers;
(11) Felony enhancement notation; and
(10)(12) Any other data that may be necessary for a complete analysis of all circumstances
leading to the arrest of an incident subject to reporting under this section.
(c) Each police law enforcement department shall forward copies of electronically submit
the domestic violence/sexual assault reporting forms and the reports corresponding police report
narratives to the unit at the end of each month. For those cases that were still under investigation
or for which an arrest warrant had been issued, but not yet executed in a given month, the
responsible law enforcement department shall electronically submit the domestic violence/sexual
assault reporting forms and the corresponding police report narratives as soon as practicable, but
not later than the end of the calendar year in which the incident occurred.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005098
========
LC005098 - Page 2 of 3